test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-ansted_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - äʹnsted: # Verb 'to steal' - full paradigm
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: äʹnstam
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: äʹnstak
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ääʹnast
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: äʹnstep
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: äʹnsteʹped
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: äʹnste 
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: äʹnstet

     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: äʹnstem
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: äʹnstiǩ
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: äʹnsti
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [äʹnstim, äʹnstin]
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: äʹnstid
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: äʹnste
     äʹnsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: äʹnsteš

     äʹnsted+V+Pot+Sg1: äʹnsteʹžem
     äʹnsted+V+Pot+Sg2: äʹnsteʹžiǩ
     äʹnsted+V+Pot+Sg3: äʹnstež
     äʹnsted+V+Pot+Pl1: [äʹnsteʹžep, äʹnsteʹžim, äʹnsteʹžin]
     äʹnsted+V+Pot+Pl2: äʹnsteʹžid 
     äʹnsted+V+Pot+Pl3: äʹnsteʹže
     äʹnsted+V+Pot+Sg4: äʹnsteʹžet
     äʹnsted+V+Pot+ConNeg: äʹnsteʹže

     äʹnsted+V+Cond+Sg1: äʹnsteʹčem
     äʹnsted+V+Cond+Sg2: äʹnsteʹčiǩ
     äʹnsted+V+Cond+Sg3: äʹnsteʹči
     äʹnsted+V+Cond+Pl1: [äʹnsteʹčim, äʹnsteʹčin, äʹnsteʹčep]
     äʹnsted+V+Cond+Pl2: äʹnsteʹčid
     äʹnsted+V+Cond+Pl3: äʹnsteʹče
     äʹnsted+V+Cond+Sg4: äʹnsteʹčeš
     äʹnsted+V+Cond+ConNeg: äʹnsteʹče

     äʹnsted+V+Imprt+Sg2: ääʹnest
     äʹnsted+V+Imprt+Sg3: äʹnstââǥǥas
     äʹnsted+V+Imprt+Pl1: äʹnstâkap
     äʹnsted+V+Imprt+Pl2: äʹnsteʹǩed
     äʹnsted+V+Imprt+Pl3: äʹnstâkaz
     äʹnsted+V+Imprt+ConNeg: äʹnstuku
     äʹnsted+V+ActEss: äʹnsteʹmen
     äʹnsted+V+Actio: äʹnstam
     äʹnsted+V+PrsPrc: äʹnsteei
     äʹnsted+V+PrfPrc: äʹnstam
     äʹnsted+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [äʹnstummu, äʹnstuum, äʹnstum]
# deduced from Sammallahti/Mosnikoff 1991 -ummu, -uum and -um occur as variants
     äʹnsted+V+VAbess: äʹnsteǩâni
     äʹnsted+V+GerTemp: äʹnsteen
     äʹnsted+V+GerInstr: äʹnsteeʹl
